Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-461
Methamphetamine precursor; seller;
immunity.

A
seller utilizing in good faith sections 28-458 to 28-462 shall be immune from
any civil cause of action based upon an act or omission in carrying out such
sections.

Laws 2011, LB20, § 6.